Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.14
Containment, defined.

Containment means a process to protect workers and the environment by controlling exposure to the lead-contaminated dust and debris created during an abatement project.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 16.